District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.11

Taxation of companies—Tax on investment income from funds representing capital stock and surplus.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 408, ch. 93, title V, § 11
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1411.
1973 Ed., § 35-1111.

Prior Codifications